Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-148
Licenses; display.

Every licensee shall cause his license or licenses to be framed and hung in plain view in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 43, p. 402;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-343;

R.S.1943, § 53-148.